Maryland, session 2026, SB0800.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
That:
(a) There is a Task Force on the Implementation of Approval Voting and
Ranked–Choice Voting.
(b) The Task Force consists of the following members:
(1) one member of the Senate, appointed by the President of the Senate;
(2) one member of the House of Delegates, appointed by the Speaker of the
House;
(3) the State Administrator of Elections, or the State Administrator’s
designee;
(4) one representative of a county government, designated by the Maryland
Association of Counties;
(5) one representative of a municipal government, designated by the
Maryland Municipal League; and
(6) the following members, appointed by the Governor:
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from exist in g l aw . *sb0800*

SENATE BILL 800
(i) one representative of a local board of elections;
(ii) one representative of an institution of higher education in the
State who has expertise in political science, public administration, or election systems;
(iii) one representative of a nonprofit organization with expertise in
election administration or voter engagement;
(iv) one representative of a civil rights organization or voting rights
organization; and
(v) one individual with expertise in election systems.
(c) The Task Force shall designate the chair of the Task Force from among its
members.
(d) The State Board of Elections shall provide staff for the Task Force.
(e) A member of the Task Force:
(1) may not receive compensation as a member of the Task Force; but
(2) is entitled to reimbursement for expenses under the Standard State
Travel Regulations, as provided in the State budget.
(f) The Task Force shall:
(1) review how approval voting and ranked–choice voting are used in other
states and local jurisdictions in the United States;
(2) evaluate potential administrative and fiscal impacts of approval voting
and ranked–choice voting on the State Board of Elections and local boards of elections,
including impacts related to ballot design, certification, tabulation, voting equipment, and
voter education;
(3) examine potential impacts of approval voting and ranked–choice voting
on voter participation, voter understanding, election outcomes, and representation;
(4) consider whether pilot programs or local option authority regarding of
approval voting and ranked–choice voting would be appropriate;
(5) analyze the constitutional and legal considerations associated with
implementing approval voting and ranked–choice voting;
(6) identify statutory or regulatory changes required to authorize or
implement approval voting and ranked–choice voting; and

SENATE BILL 800 3
(7) develop findings and recommendations for legislative or administrative
action.
(g) On or before December 1, 2027, the Task Force shall report its findings and
recommendations to the Governor and, in accordance with § 2–1257 of the State
Government Article, the General Assembly.
SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act shall take effect
October 1, 2026. It shall remain effective for a period of 1 year and 9 months and, at the
end of June 30, 2028, this Act, with no further action required by the General Assembly,
shall be abrogated and of no further force and effect.